Vermont, session 2025-2026, S34.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6252 is amended to read:
§ 6252. LOT RENT INCREASE DISPUTE; MEDIATION
(a)(1) If the percentage of a proposed A mobile home park owner shall not
propose a lot rent increase is of more than one percentage point above the U.S.
Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers, Housing Component,
published by the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics in the periodical “Monthly
Labor Review and Handbook of Labor Statistics” as established annually by
the Department, and if,.
(2) If, within 15 business days after receipt by the Commissioner of the
notice required pursuant to subsection 6251(a) of this title, a majority of the
affected leaseholders files with the Commissioner and the park owner a written
VT LEG #379819 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.34
2025 Page 2 of 3
petition that includes the name of the person who will act as the representative
of the leaseholders, and a statement that they dispute the proposed lot rent
increase, the Commissioner shall send a list of qualified professional mediators
compiled by the Department in cooperation with park owners and leaseholders
to the park owner and to the leaseholders’ representative. Within five business
days of after receipt of the list, the park owner and the leaseholders’
representative shall agree on a mediator from the list provided by the
Commissioner and notify the Commissioner of the name, address, and
telephone number of the mediator selected, accompanied by the mediator’s
agreement to conduct the mediation. If the Commissioner has not been
notified of a mediator as required by this subsection, the Commissioner shall
appoint a mediator from the Department’s list. The mediator may not have any
interest, direct or indirect, in the mobile home park at issue and shall disclose
to the park owner, the leaseholders, and the Commissioner any experience as a
mobile home park owner, resident, or leaseholder, or any other circumstance
that may create a real or perceived conflict of interest. The Department shall
pay the reasonable fees for professional mediation services based on a schedule
established by rule of the Department.
(b) The mediator shall conduct one or more mediation sessions within the
period that ends 10 days prior to the effective date of the proposed lot rent
increase. The mediation shall include the mobile home park owner and the
VT LEG #379819 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.34
2025 Page 3 of 3
leaseholders, or their respective representatives, and shall attempt to resolve
the dispute. No Not later than five days before the initial mediation session,
the mobile home park owner shall provide to the mediator and the
leaseholders’ representative all documents and information that the park owner
considers relevant to support the proposed lot rent increase. The mobile home
park owner shall have the burden of providing information to show that the
proposed lot rent increase is reasonable. The mediator may also request any
additional documents or information for the purposes of the mediation process.
Any resolution of the dispute shall include an agreement regarding the amount
of the lot rent increase and the effective date. If the dispute is resolved, the
mobile home park owner shall not be required to provide any additional notice
in order for the lot rent increase to take effect pursuant to the resolution.
(c) The mediator shall issue to the parties and the Commissioner a report
signed by the mediator and the parties regarding the outcome of the mediation.
The report shall not be admitted into evidence and the mediator shall not be
competent to testify in any subsequent action regarding the proposed lot rent
increase.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379819 v.1